Texas, session 892, HB232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 418, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter M to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER M.  DISASTER RECOVERY FUND Sec. 418.451.  FINDINGS AND PURPOSE. (a)  The legislature finds that natural disasters frequently result in injury to residents of this state and cause property damage and financial loss. (b)  The purpose of this subchapter is to provide compensation to residents of this state who are victims of a natural disaster when federal disaster relief does not adequately address the losses suffered by those residents. Sec. 418.452.  DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter: (1)  "Claimant" means: (A)  an individual who is a resident of this state who suffers direct personal injury, financial loss, or property damage or loss as a result of a qualifying weather event; or (B)  a person who legally assumes the obligation to pay or who voluntarily pays expenses related to the recovery of an individual described by Paragraph (A). (2)  "Fund" means the disaster recovery fund established under Section 418.453. (3)  "Qualifying weather event" means a natural disaster caused by severe weather conditions, including floods, hurricanes, fires, tornadoes, wind, hail, lightning, extreme heat, ice, or snow, that results in a declaration of a state of emergency or disaster in this state by the governor or a federal authority. Sec. 418.453.  DISASTER RECOVERY FUND. (a)  The disaster recovery fund is established as a special fund in the state treasury to be administered by the division. (b)  The fund consists of: (1)  money appropriated by the legislature for deposit or transfer to the credit of the fund; (2)  grants or other money received from the federal government that may be used for a purpose of the fund; (3)  donations, gifts, or grants received by the division that may be used for a purpose of the fund; (4)  revenue from assessments or surcharges deposited to the credit of the fund as directed by the legislature; and (5)  interest earned on the money in the fund. (c)  Money in the fund may be appropriated to the division only to provide compensation for a purpose described by Section 418.455 to an eligible claimant. Sec. 418.454.  ELIGIBILITY. A claimant is eligible for compensation paid from the fund if the claimant submits an application to the division for a type of compensation authorized under Section 418.455 not later than the second anniversary of the date of the qualifying weather event that forms the basis of the claim. Sec. 418.455.  COMPENSATION. (a)  The division may, using money in the fund appropriated for that purpose, pay compensation to an eligible claimant for any of the following expenses incurred as a result of a qualifying weather event: (1)  repair or replacement of property; (2)  medical expenses related to injuries sustained by the claimant; (3)  temporary housing or relocation costs; (4)  lost wages due to displacement or injury; or (5)  other reasonable expenses directly related to recovery from the qualifying weather event. (b)  The division may not pay compensation to a claimant who would otherwise be eligible for the compensation if: (1)  the claimant knowingly or intentionally contributed to the injury or loss that forms the basis of the claim; or (2)  the claimant has been or will be fully reimbursed for the injury or loss by insurance or another federal or state assistance program. (c)  The division may establish maximum compensation limits for each category of compensation authorized by this section. Sec. 418.456.  APPLICATION. (a)  A claimant must submit an application to the division in the form and manner prescribed by the division. (b)  The application must include at least the following information: (1)  proof of the claimant's residency; (2)  documentation of losses or expenses that are the subject of the application; and (3)  evidence that the loss or injury is the direct result of a qualifying weather event. Sec. 418.457.  PAYMENT OF CLAIM; LIMITATIONS. (a)  The division shall approve or deny a claim not later than the 60th day after the date the division receives a completed application from a claimant. (b)  The division is not required to pay a claim if sufficient money is not appropriated by the legislature to pay the claim. (c)  The division may prioritize the payment of certain claims based on demonstrated need and the severity of the effects of the qualifying weather event. Sec. 418.458.  RULES. The division may adopt rules as necessary for carrying out the purposes of this subchapter. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.